Texas, session 892, HB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Not later than January 1, 2027, the Texas Water Development Board shall: (1)  conduct a study to identify ways to streamline the state environmental review process of flood control and drainage projects eligible for financial assistance from the flood infrastructure fund under Chapter 15, Water Code; and (2)  develop and implement internal guidelines and procedures to streamline the state environmental review process for projects described by Subdivision (1) of this section based on the results of the study conducted under that subdivision. SECTION 2.  This Act expires September 1, 2027. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.